Wyoming, session 2025, SF0036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-50-101 and 33-50-102 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 50
MUSIC THERAPISTS

33-50-101. Definitions.

SF0036

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0132
(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Music therapist" means a person who holds
an active music therapist board certified credential
granted by the certification board for music therapists;

(ii) "Music therapy" means the clinical and
evidence based use of music interventions to accomplish
individualized goals for persons of all ages and ability
levels that are delivered during the course of a
therapeutic relationship.

33-50-102. Practice or use of title; exceptions.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to profess to be a
music therapist or advertise in any form or hold themselves
out to the public as a music therapist, board certified
music therapist or use the initials "MT-BC" or any other
words, letters, abbreviations or insignia indicating or
implying that the person is a music therapist unless the
person holds and maintains a music therapist board
certified credential granted by the certification board for
music therapists.
SF0036

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0132

(b) This chapter shall not prohibit a person from
using music in the performance of the person's profession
or occupation if the person does not represent that they
are a music therapist.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0036